Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2950.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-17.14 of the General Laws entitled "The Hospital Conversions
Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-17.14-37. Bond requirement for private equity company or REIT investment.
(a) Any private equity company or real estate investment trust (REIT) engaging in a
transaction that will lead to the private equity company or the REIT obtaining direct or indirect
ownership or control of a provider, as defined in federal law, 42 CFR § 400.202 or provider-
sponsored organization (PSO), pursuant to federal law 42 U.S.C. § 1395w-25(d) shall:
(1) Submit a notice of material change to the department of attorney general pursuant to
rules promulgated pursuant to § 6-36-22 to include, but not limited to, 110-RICR 30-00-5; and
(2) Deposit, a bond with the department of health ("department").
(b) The private equity company or REIT shall not use the provider or PSO or the provider's
or PSO’s assets or property as security for the bond, pay for the bond by placing debt on the provider
or PSO, permit the provider or PSO to pay the bond on the private equity company or REIT’s
behalf, or allow the provider or PSO to otherwise be liable or indemnify the private equity company
or REIT for the bond.
(c) Until such bond has been deposited, the department shall not issue a license to such
provider or PSO under this chapter, and any material change notice submitted pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section shall be deemed incomplete. If the bond has not been deposited, but

the department would otherwise be permitted to collect the bond, the department shall be permitted
to collect from the private equity company or the REIT the amount the department would have
been able to collect had the bond been deposited.
(d) The department shall determine the amount of the bond, which shall equal one year of
the provider's or PSO’s average or estimated operating expenses, plus the estimated cost of hiring
an independent supervisor and reasonable staff to supervise and facilitate collecting and spending
the bond. The private equity company or REIT shall maintain the bond for as long as the private
equity company or REIT directly or indirectly owns or controls the provider or PSO, and for seven
(7) years thereafter.
(e) The department may collect the bond if the provider or PSO declares bankruptcy, is at
imminent risk of closure, or closes a majority of the essential services the provider or PSO provides,
as determined by the department. The department shall use the bond proceeds to support the
continued provision of healthcare services to patients served by the provider or PSO. Prior to
spending the bond, the department shall seek input from the public, including, but not limited to,
providers, PSOs and patients, regarding how to spend the bond. The department may select an
independent supervisor and reasonable staff to supervise and facilitate collecting and spending the
bond. This section does not provide the department with the authority to petition for the
appointment of a receiver for the provider or PSO.
(f) The private equity company or the REIT is prohibited from interfering with or
controlling the clinical decisions of health care practitioners.
(g) The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005377
========
LC005377 - Page 2 of 3